Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2203
Warrants; registration; manner of making.

Whenever a warrant is presented for payment to any such treasurer and there is not sufficient money on hand to the credit of the proper fund to pay the same, it shall be the duty of every such treasurer to enter such warrant in his warrant register for payment in the order of its presentation, and upon every warrant so presented and registered, he shall endorse registered for payment, with the date of registration, and shall sign such endorsement.

Laws 1871, § 3, p. 114;

Laws 1891, c. 56, § 1, p. 394;

Laws 1907, c. 158, § 1, p. 492;

R.S.1913, § 6644;

C.S.1922, § 6175;

C.S.1929, § 77-2403;

R.S.1943, § 77-2203.

A public treasurer is authorized to register warrants only when no other reason exists for their nonpayment except that there are not sufficient funds on hand for payment thereof. Pollock v. Consolidated School District, 138 Neb. 315, 293 N.W. 108 (1940).

It is the duty of treasurer to register warrants in order presented. State ex rel. Stull Bros. v. Bartley, 41 Neb. 277, 59 N.W. 907 (1894).